Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1673.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 9PROHIBITION ON LAW ENFORCEMENT USEOF CHEMICAL WEAPONSSec.901. Scope of chapter.902. Definitions.903. Prohibition on use of chemical weapons.§ 901. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the prohibition on law enforcement use of chemical weapons.§ 902. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 12345678910111213141516171819 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chemical weapon." The following:(1) Tear or noxious gas as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2708(b) (relating to use of tear or noxious gas in labor disputes), including chlorobenzalmalononitrile or oleoresin capsicum.(2) Mace.(3) A pepper ball.(4) A pepper spray.(5) Any chemical compound intended to incapacitate an individual or cause pain, discomfort or any other form of harm to an individual."Crowd control." Directing the manner in which the public gathers together at a planned or impromptu event and moves at and around the event terrain."Kinetic impact projectile." An item shot from a type of gun, launcher or other projectile weapon used for crowd control by a law enforcement agency, including:(1) A rubber or plastic bullet.(2) A bean bag round.(3) A sponge round.(4) A pellet round.(5) Any other similar item used by law enforcement."Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(1) The Pennsylvania State Police.(2) The Pennsylvania Capitol Police.(3) The Harrisburg International Airport Police.(4) An airport authority police department.(5) A county park police force under 16 Pa.C.S. § 20250HB1673PN2046 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 16511(b) (relating to employees and police).(6) A public agency of a political subdivision having general police powers and charged with making arrests in connection with the enforcement of the criminal or traffic laws, including the sheriff's office in a county of the second class.(7) A campus police or university police department.(8) A railroad or street railway police department.(9) Any other individual or entity authorized to exercise peace officer powers within this Commonwealth."Peace officer." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions).§ 903. Prohibition on use of chemical weapons.(a) General rule.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a law enforcement agency or peace officer may not do the following:(1) Use, deploy or threaten to use or deploy kinetic impact projectiles into a crowd or gathering of individuals for any reason or as a means to control the activity or movement of a gathering of individuals.(2) Use, deploy or threaten to use or deploy a chemical weapon in any situation.(b) Exception.--A law enforcement agency or peace officer may use pepper spray if the following conditions are met:(1) An individual is actively combative, physically threatening and ignoring or resisting the verbal commands and warnings of a peace officer.(2) The behavior of the individual is causing imminent danger of injury or death to a peace officer or another individual.20250HB1673PN2046 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The peace officer has given at least two verbal warnings to the individual that the peace officer will use pepper spray if the individual does not cease the behavior which has placed a peace officer or another individual in imminent danger of injury or death.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1673PN2046 - 4 - 123456